New Jersey, session 221, S3592.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Within 180 days following the effective date of this act, a youth camp operator, municipal or county recreation department, and a nonprofit youth serving organization as defined in section 1 of P.L.1999, c.432 (C.15A:3A-1) including, but not limited to, Little Leagues, Babe Ruth Leagues, Pop Warner Leagues, Police Athletic Leagues, and youth soccer leagues, which organizes, sponsors, or is otherwise affiliated with youth athletic events that are played on municipal, county, school, or other publicly-owned fields, shall ensure that there is available on site an automated external defibrillator, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-24), at each youth athletic event and practice held on the home field of the youth camp operator, municipal or county recreation department, or nonprofit youth serving organization. b.    A youth camp operator, municipal or county recreation department, or nonprofit youth serving organization shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section if a State-certified emergency services provider or other certified first responder is on site at the athletic event or practice and has a defibrillator available for use on site. c.     Notwithstanding any provisions of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-23 et seq.) to the contrary, a youth camp operator, municipal or county recreation department, or nonprofit youth serving organization, and employees, volunteers, coaches, and licensed athletic trainers of the youth camp operator, municipal or county recreation department, or nonprofit youth serving organization, shall be immune from civil liability in the acquisition and use of a defibrillator. d. As used in this section, "youth camp operator" means the same as that term is defined by section 3 of P.L.1973, c.375 (C.26:12-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.